Mississippi, session 2026, SB2258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Over seven percent (7%) of Mississippi's 2022 population is of Irish descent, making it the third largest ancestry in the Magnolia State, with more than two hundred ten thousand (210,000) citizens claiming heritage from the Emerald Isle.  Irish settlers came to Mississippi in several waves of immigration, and their legacy includes business and industry, political, religious, and civic activity.  Former Mississippi Governor Gerard Brandon was the grandson of Irish immigrants; and (b)  Beyond historical ties, the Irish have long been important to Mississippi's economy.  Based on federal data, Ireland is Mississippi's twelfth largest foreign trade partner, representing industries such as agriculture, aerospace, and pharmaceuticals. With a stable political environment and growing economy, Ireland is poised to advance bilateral trade and investment through direct relationships with Mississippi businesses, elected leaders, educational institutions, and markets. SECTION 2. (1)  For purposes of this section, "commission" means the Mississippi-Ireland Trade Commission. (2)  (a)  There is hereby established the Mississippi-Ireland Trade Commission, which shall consist of ten (10) members, to be appointed as follows: (i)  The Governor shall appoint three (3) members, one (1) for an initial term of one (1) year, and two (2) for initial terms of two (2) years; (ii)  The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint two (2) members of the Senate, one (1) for an initial term of three (3) years and one (1) for an initial term of four (4) years; (iii)  The Speaker of the House shall appoint two (2) members of the House of Representatives, one (1) for an initial term of three (3) years and one (1) for an initial term of four (4) years; (iv)  The President of the Mississippi Economic Council shall appoint one (1) member for an initial term of (1) year; (v)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, or his or her designee, shall serve as an ex officio member; and (vi)  The Commissioner of the Institutions of Higher Learning, or his or her designee, shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member. (b)  All appointees of the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, and President of the Mississippi Economic Council shall have either current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs, or an interest in the well-being of trade relations between Mississippi and Ireland. (c)  All initial appointments shall be made no later than July 1, 2026.  After the expiration of the initial term, all terms shall be for a period of four (4) years.  A vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made.  A vacancy occurring during an unexpired term shall be filled for the remainder of the term. (3)  Appointed members shall serve without compensation at the will and pleasure of the appointing authority.  The commission shall elect a chairman and such other officers as it considers necessary from among its members.  A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of meetings, and all actions of the commission shall be by a majority vote.  The commission shall meet, subject to call by the chairman, at least quarterly. (4)  The purpose of the commission shall be to: (a)  Advance bilateral trade and investment between Mississippi and Ireland; (b)  Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to Mississippi and Ireland; (c)  Promote business and academic exchanges between Mississippi and Ireland; (d)  Encourage mutual economic support between Mississippi and Ireland; (e)  Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of Mississippi and Ireland; and (f)  Address such other issues as determined by the commission. (5)  The Mississippi-Ireland Trade Commission shall be authorized to raise funds, through direct solicitation or other fundraising events, alone or with other groups, and to accept gifts, grants, and bequests from individuals, corporations, foundations, governmental agencies, and public and private organizations and institutions to carry out its purposes. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after March 17, 2026.